Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1626
Activity endangering or causing damage to public health or the environment; restrain; procedure.

In addition to the penalties prescribed under sections 57-1620 and 57-1625, whenever it appears to the commission, upon receipt of information that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act by engaging in any unauthorized activity which is endangering or causing damage to public health or the environment, the commission is authorized to restrain immediately and effectively any such person. The commission may restrain such person by its own order, appealable by hearing before the commission, or by suit filed by the Attorney General in the name and on behalf of the commission, in the district court of the county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides if there be more than one defendant, or in the district court of any county in which the violation occurred. In any such suit the court shall have jurisdiction and authority to issue, without bond or other undertaking, such prohibitory and mandatory injunctions as the facts may warrant.

Laws 2026, LB759, § 8.
April 8, 2026